Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.220

Administrative proceedings.

All administrative proceedings under this chapter must be conducted in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Any licensee or authorized delegate subject to a statement of charges and order of intent from the director shall be provided with an opportunity for a hearing as provided for in the administrative procedure act. Unless the person subject to the order appears in person or is represented by counsel at the hearing, the person has consented to issuance of the order. If after a hearing, the director finds by a preponderance of the evidence that grounds for sanctions under this chapter exist, then the director may impose any sanctions authorized by this chapter in a final order. As provided for in RCW 19.230.260, a temporary order to cease and desist is effective upon service upon the licensee or authorized delegate, and remains effective pending a hearing to determine if the order shall become permanent.

[ 2003 c 287 s 24.]